Maine, session 132, LD1425.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. Appropriations and allocations. The following appropriations and
allocations are made.
ATTORNEY GENERAL, DEPARTMENT OF THE
Administration - Attorney General 0310
Initiative: Provides one-time funding only in fiscal years 2025-26 and 2026-27 to the Maine
Resiliency Center in Lewiston to support the continuation and expansion of services for
residents of the State affected by the immediate and cumulative effects of trauma through
connection, information and support.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $1,093,795 $2,270,199
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $1,093,795 $2,270,199